District of Columbia statutes.
7-1531.18

Law governing validity; choice of law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

(a)

A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:

(1)

This subchapter;

(2)

The laws of the state or country where it was executed; or

(3)

The laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

(b)

If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of the District of Columbia governs the interpretation of the document of gift.

(c)

A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-145, § 19, 55 DCR 2532
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 19 of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act (2006).